Florida, session 2026, SB970.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 57 58 Section 1.âSection 468.371, Florida Statutes, is created to 59 read: 60 468.371âRespiratory Care Interstate Compact.âThe 61 Respiratory Care Interstate Compact is hereby enacted into law 62 and entered into by this state with all other states legally 63 joining therein in the form substantially as follows: 64 65 RESPIRATORY CARE INTERSTATE COMPACT 66 67 ARTICLE I 68 PURPOSE AND INTENT 69 70 (1)âThe purpose of this compact is to facilitate the 71 interstate practice of respiratory therapy with the goal of 72 improving public access to respiratory therapy services by 73 providing respiratory therapists licensed in a member state the 74 ability to practice in other member states. The compact 75 preserves the regulatory authority of states to protect public 76 health and safety through the current system of state licensure. 77 (2)âThis compact is designed to achieve all of the 78 following objectives: 79 (a)âIncrease public access to respiratory therapy services 80 by creating a responsible, streamlined pathway for licensees to 81 practice in member states with the goal of improving outcomes 82 for patients. 83 (b)âEnhance statesâ ability to protect the publicâs health 84 and safety. 85 (c)âPromote the cooperation of member states in regulating 86 the practice of respiratory therapy within such member states. 87 (d)âEase administrative burdens on states by encouraging 88 the cooperation of member states in regulating multistate 89 respiratory therapy practice. 90 (e)âSupport relocating active military members and their 91 spouses. 92 (f)âPromote mobility and address workforce shortages. 93 94 ARTICLE II 95 DEFINITIONS 96 97 As used in this compact, the term: 98 (1)ââActive military memberâ means any person with a full 99 time duty status in the Armed Forces of the United States, 100 including members of the National Guard and the United States 101 Reserve Forces. 102 (2)ââAdverse actionâ means any administrative, civil, 103 equitable, or criminal action permitted by a stateâs laws which 104 is imposed by any state authority with regulatory authority over 105 respiratory therapists, such as license denial, censure, 106 revocation, suspension, probation, monitoring of the licensee, 107 or restriction on the licenseeâs practice. The term does not 108 include participation in an alternative program. 109 (3)ââAlternative programâ means a nondisciplinary 110 monitoring or practice remediation process applicable to a 111 respiratory therapist approved by any state authority with 112 regulatory authority over respiratory therapists. This includes, 113 but is not limited to, programs to which licensees with 114 substance abuse or addiction issues are referred in lieu of 115 adverse action. 116 (4)ââCharter member statesâ means those member states who 117 were the first seven states to enact the compact into law. 118 (5)ââCommissionâ or âRespiratory Care Interstate Compact 119 Commissionâ means the government instrumentality and body 120 politic whose membership consists of all member states that have 121 enacted the compact. 122 (6)ââCommissionerâ means the individual appointed by a 123 member state to serve as the member of the commission for that 124 member state. 125 (7)ââCompactâ means the Respiratory Care Interstate 126 Compact. 127 (8)ââCompact privilegeâ means the authorization granted by 128 a remote state to allow a licensee from another member state to 129 practice as a respiratory therapist in the remote state under 130 the remote stateâs laws and rules. The practice of respiratory 131 therapy occurs in the member state where the patient is located 132 at the time of the patient encounter. 133 (9)ââCriminal background checkâ means the submission by the 134 member state of fingerprints or other biometric-based 135 information on license applicants at the time of initial 136 licensing for the purpose of obtaining that applicantâs criminal 137 history record information, as defined in 28 C.F.R. s. 20.3(d) 138 or successor provision, from the Federal Bureau of Investigation 139 and the stateâs criminal history record repository, as defined 140 in 28 C.F.R. s. 20.3(f) or successor provision. 141 (10)ââData systemâ means the commissionâs repository of 142 information about licensees as further set forth in Article 143 VIII. 144 (11)ââDomicileâ means the jurisdiction which is the 145 licenseeâs principal home for legal purposes. 146 (12)ââEncumbered licenseâ means a license that a stateâs 147 respiratory therapy licensing authority has limited in any way. 148 (13)ââExecutive committeeâ means a group of directors 149 elected or appointed to act on behalf of, and within the powers 150 granted to them by, the commission. 151 (14)ââHome state,â except as provided in Article V, means 152 the member state that is the licenseeâs primary domicile. 153 (15)ââHome state licenseâ means an active license to 154 practice respiratory therapy in a home state which is not an 155 encumbered license. 156 (16)ââJurisprudence requirementâ means an assessment of an 157 individualâs knowledge of the state laws and regulations 158 governing the practice of respiratory therapy in such state. 159 (17)ââLicenseeâ means an individual who currently holds an 160 authorization from the state to practice as a respiratory 161 therapist. 162 (18)ââMember stateâ means a state that has enacted the 163 compact and been admitted to the commission in accordance with 164 this compact and commission rules. 165 (19)ââModel compactâ means the model for the Respiratory 166 Care Interstate Compact on file with the Council of State 167 Governments or other entity as designated by the commission. 168 (20)ââRemote stateâ means a member state where a licensee 169 is exercising or seeking to exercise the compact privilege. 170 (21)ââRespiratory therapistâ or ârespiratory care 171 practitionerâ means an individual who holds a credential issued 172 by the National Board for Respiratory Care or its successor and 173 holds a license in a state to practice respiratory therapy. For 174 purposes of this compact, any other title or status adopted by a 175 state to replace the term ârespiratory therapistâ or 176 ârespiratory care practitionerâ is synonymous with ârespiratory 177 therapistâ and shall confer the same rights and responsibilities 178 to the licensee under the provisions of this compact at the time 179 of its enactment. 180 (22)ââRespiratory therapy,â ârespiratory therapy practice,â 181 ârespiratory care,â âthe practice of respiratory therapy,â and 182 âthe practice of respiratory careâ mean the care and services 183 provided by or under the direction and supervision of a 184 respiratory therapist or respiratory care practitioner. 185 (23)ââRespiratory therapy licensing authorityâ means the 186 agency, board, or other body of a state that is responsible for 187 licensing and regulation of respiratory therapists. 188 (24)ââRuleâ means a regulation adopted by an entity that 189 has the force and effect of law. 190 (25)ââScope of practiceâ means the procedures, actions, and 191 processes a respiratory therapist licensed in a state or 192 practicing under a compact privilege in a state is permitted to 193 undertake in that state and the circumstances under which the 194 respiratory therapist is permitted to undertake those 195 procedures, actions, and processes. Such procedures, actions, 196 and processes, and the circumstances under which they may be 197 undertaken, may be established through means including, but not 198 limited to, statute, regulations, case law, and other processes 199 available to the state respiratory therapy licensing authority 200 or other government agency. 201 (26)ââSignificant investigative informationâ means 202 information, records, and documents received or generated by a 203 state respiratory therapy licensing authority pursuant to an 204 investigation for which a determination has been made that there 205 is probable cause to believe that the licensee has violated a 206 statute or regulation that is considered more than a minor 207 infraction for which the state respiratory therapy licensing 208 authority could pursue adverse action against the licensee. 209 (27)ââStateâ means any state, commonwealth, district, or 210 territory of the United States. 211 212 ARTICLE III 213 STATE PARTICIPATION IN THIS COMPACT 214 215 (1)âIn order to participate in this compact and thereafter 216 continue as a member state, a member state shall: 217 (a)âEnact a compact that is not materially different from 218 the model compact. 219 (b)âLicense respiratory therapists. 220 (c)âParticipate in the data system. 221 (d)âHave a mechanism in place for receiving and 222 investigating complaints against licensees and compact privilege 223 holders. 224 (e)âNotify the commission, in compliance with the terms of 225 this compact and commission rules, of any adverse action against 226 a licensee, a compact privilege holder, or a license applicant. 227 (f)âNotify the commission, in compliance with the terms of 228 this compact and commission rules, of the existence of 229 significant investigative information. 230 (g)âComply with the rules of the commission. 231 (h)âGrant the compact privilege to a holder of an active 232 home state license and otherwise meet the applicable 233 requirements of Article IV in a member state. 234 (i)âComplete a criminal background check for each new 235 licensee at the time of initial licensure. Where expressly 236 authorized or permitted by federal law, whether such federal law 237 is in effect before, at, or after the time of a member stateâs 238 enactment of this compact, a member stateâs enactment of this 239 compact authorizes the member stateâs respiratory therapy 240 licensing authority to perform criminal background checks as 241 defined herein. The absence of such a federal law as described 242 in this paragraph does not prevent or preclude such 243 authorization where it may be derived or granted through means 244 other than the enactment of this compact. 245 (2)âThis compact does not prohibit a member state from 246 charging a fee for granting and renewing the compact privilege. 247 248 ARTICLE IV 249 COMPACT PRIVILEGE 250 251 (1)âTo exercise the compact privilege under this compact, a 252 licensee shall: 253 (a)âHold and maintain an active home state license as a 254 respiratory therapist. 255 (b)âHold and maintain an active credential from the 256 National Board for Respiratory Care, or its successor, that 257 would qualify him or her for licensure in the remote state in 258 which he or she is seeking the compact privilege. 259 (c)âHave not had any adverse action against a license 260 within the previous 2 years. 261 (d)âNotify the commission that he or she is seeking the 262 compact privilege within a remote state. 263 (e)âPay any applicable fees, including any state and 264 commission fees and renewal fees, for the compact privilege. 265 (f)âMeet any jurisprudence requirements established by the 266 remote state in which he or she is seeking a compact privilege. 267 (g)âReport to the commission any adverse action taken by 268 any nonmember state within 30 days after the date the adverse 269 action is taken. 270 (h)âReport to the commission, when applying for a compact 271 privilege, the address of his or her domicile and thereafter 272 promptly report to the commission any change of address within 273 30 days after the effective date of the change in address. 274 (i)âConsent to accept service of process by mail at his or 275 her domicile on record with the commission with respect to any 276 action brought against him or her by the commission or a member 277 state, and consent to accept service of a subpoena by mail at 278 the licenseeâs domicile on record with the commission with 279 respect to any action brought or investigation conducted by the 280 commission or a member state. 281 (2)âThe compact privilege is valid until the expiration 282 date or revocation of the home state license unless terminated 283 pursuant to adverse action. The licensee must comply with all of 284 the requirements of subsection (1) to maintain the compact 285 privilege in a remote state. If those requirements are met, no 286 adverse actions are taken, and the licensee has paid any 287 applicable compact privilege renewal fees, then the licensee 288 will maintain the compact privilege. 289 (3)âA licensee providing respiratory therapy in a remote 290 state under the compact privilege functions may practice only 291 within the scope of practice authorized by the remote state for 292 the type of respiratory therapist license the licensee holds. 293 Such procedures, actions, processes, and the circumstances under 294 which they may be undertaken may be established through means 295 including, but not limited to, statute, regulations, case law, 296 and other processes available to the state respiratory therapy 297 licensing authority or other government agency. 298 (4)âIf a licenseeâs compact privilege in a remote state is 299 removed by the remote state, the licensee shall lose or be 300 ineligible for the compact privilege in that remote state until 301 the compact privilege is no longer limited or restricted by that 302 state. 303 (5)âIf a home state license is encumbered, the licensee 304 shall lose the compact privilege in all remote states until both 305 of the following occur: 306 (a)âThe home state license is no longer encumbered. 307 (b)âTwo years have elapsed from the date on which the 308 license is no longer encumbered due to the adverse action. 309 (6)âOnce a licensee with a restricted or limited license 310 meets the requirements of subsection (5), the licensee must also 311 meet the requirements of subsection (1) to obtain a compact 312 privilege in a remote state. 313 314 ARTICLE V 315 ACTIVE MILITARY MEMBERS AND THEIR SPOUSES 316 317 (1)âAn active military member, or his or her spouse, shall 318 designate a home state where the individual has a current 319 license in good standing. The individual may retain the home 320 state designation during the period the service member is on 321 active duty. 322 (2)âAn active military member and his or her spouse are not 323 required to pay to the commission any fee for a compact 324 privilege which may otherwise be charged by the commission. If a 325 remote state chooses to charge a fee for a compact privilege, it 326 may choose to charge a reduced fee or no fee to an active 327 military member and his or her spouse for a compact privilege. 328 329 ARTICLE VI 330 ADVERSE ACTIONS 331 332 (1)âA member state in which a licensee is licensed may 333 impose adverse action against the license issued by that member 334 state. 335 (2)âA member state may take adverse action based on 336 significant investigative information of a remote state or the 337 home state, so long as the member state follows its own 338 procedures for imposing adverse action. 339 (3)âThis compact does not override a member stateâs 340 decision that participation in an alternative program may be 341 used in lieu of adverse action and that such participation shall 342 remain nonpublic if required by the member stateâs laws. 343 (4)âA remote state may: 344 (a)âTake adverse actions as provided herein against a 345 licenseeâs compact privilege in that state. 346 (b)âIssue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations 347 that require the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the 348 production of evidence. 349 1.âSubpoenas may be issued by a respiratory therapy 350 licensing authority in a member state for the attendance and 351 testimony of witnesses and the production of evidence. 352 2.âSubpoenas issued by a respiratory therapy licensing 353 authority in a member state for the attendance and testimony of 354 witnesses shall be enforced in the latter state by any court of 355 competent jurisdiction in the latter state, according to the 356 practice and procedure of that court applicable to subpoenas 357 issued in proceedings pending before it. 358 3.âSubpoenas issued by a respiratory therapy licensing 359 authority in a member state for production of evidence from 360 another member state shall be enforced in the latter state, 361 according to the practice and procedure of that court applicable 362 to subpoenas issued in the proceedings pending before it. 363 4.âThe issuing authority shall pay any witness fees, travel 364 expenses, mileage, and other fees required by the service 365 statutes of the state where the witnesses or evidence are 366 located. 367 (c)âUnless otherwise prohibited by general law, recover 368 from the licensee the costs of investigations and disposition of 369 cases resulting from any adverse action taken against that 370 licensee. 371 (d)âNotwithstanding paragraph (b), a member state may not 372 issue a subpoena to gather evidence of conduct in another member 373 state which is lawful in such other member state for the purpose 374 of taking adverse action against a licenseeâs compact privilege 375 or application for a compact privilege in that member state. 376 (e)âThis compact does not authorize a member state to 377 impose discipline against a respiratory therapistâs compact 378 privilege in that member state for the licenseeâs otherwise 379 lawful practice in another state. 380 (5)(a)âIn addition to the authority granted to a member 381 state by its respective respiratory therapy practice act or 382 other applicable state law, a member state may participate with 383 other member states in joint investigations of licensees, 384 provided, however, that a member state receiving such a request 385 has no obligation to respond to any subpoena issued regarding an 386 investigation of conduct or practice that was lawful in a member 387 state at the time it was undertaken. 388 (b)âMember states shall share any significant investigative 389 information, litigation, or compliance materials in furtherance 390 of any joint or individual investigation initiated under the 391 compact. In sharing such information between member state 392 respiratory therapy licensing authorities, all information 393 obtained shall be kept confidential, except as otherwise 394 mutually agreed upon by the sharing and receiving member states. 395 (6)âThis compact does not permit a member state to: 396 (a)âTake any adverse action against a licensee or holder of 397 a compact privilege for conduct or practice that was legal in 398 the member state at the time it was undertaken. 399 (b)âTake disciplinary action against a licensee or holder 400 of a compact privilege for conduct or practice that was legal in 401 the member state at the time it was undertaken. 402 403 ARTICLE VII 404 ESTABLISHMENT OF THE RESPIRATORY CARE 405 INTERSTATE COMPACT COMMISSION 406 407 (1)âESTABLISHMENT OF THE COMMISSION.âThe member states 408 hereby create and establish a joint government agency whose 409 membership consists of all member states that have enacted the 410 compact, to be known as the Respiratory Care Interstate Compact 411 Commission. The commission is an instrumentality of the compact 412 member states acting jointly and not an instrumentality of any 413 one state. The commission shall come into existence on or after 414 the effective date of the compact, as provided in Article XI. 415 (2)âMEMBERSHIP, VOTING, AND MEETINGS.â 416 (a)âEach member state shall have one commissioner selected 417 by that member stateâs respiratory therapy licensing authority. 418 (b)âThe commissioner or his or her designated staff member 419 shall be an administrator of the member stateâs respiratory 420 therapy licensing authority. 421 (c)âThe commission shall by rule or bylaw establish a term 422 of office for commissioners and may by rule or bylaw establish 423 term limits. 424 (d)âThe commission may recommend to a member state the 425 removal or suspension any commissioner from office. 426 (e)âA member stateâs respiratory therapy licensing 427 authority shall fill any vacancy occurring on the commission 428 within 60 days after the vacancy. 429 (f)âEach commissioner shall be entitled to one vote on all 430 matters before the commission requiring a vote. 431 (g)âA commissioner shall vote in person or by such other 432 means as provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may provide for 433 commissioners to meet by telecommunication, videoconference, or 434 other means of communication. 435 (h)âThe commission shall meet at least once during each 436 calendar year. Additional meetings may be held as provided in 437 the bylaws. 438 (3)âPOWERS OF THE COMMISSION.âThe commission may: 439 (a)âEstablish and amend the fiscal year of the commission. 440 (b)âEstablish and amend bylaws and policies, including, but 441 not limited to, a code of conduct and conflict of interest. 442 (c)âEstablish and amend rules, which shall be binding in 443 all member states. 444 (d)âMaintain its financial records in accordance with the 445 bylaws. 446 (e)âMeet and take such actions as are consistent with this 447 compact, the commissionâs rules, and the bylaws. 448 (f)âInitiate and conduct legal proceedings or actions in 449 the name of the commission, provided that the standing of any 450 respiratory therapy licensing authority to sue or be sued under 451 applicable law is not affected. 452 (g)âMaintain and certify records and information provided 453 to a member state as the authenticated business records of the 454 commission and designate an agent to do so on the commissionâs 455 behalf. 456 (h)âPurchase and maintain insurance and bonds. 457 (i)âAccept or contract for services of personnel, 458 including, but not limited to, employees of a member state. 459 (j)âConduct an annual financial review. 460 (k)âHire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix 461 compensation, define duties, grant such individuals appropriate 462 authority to carry out the purposes of the compact, and 463 establish the commissionâs personnel policies and programs 464 relating to conflicts of interest, qualifications of personnel, 465 and other related personnel matters. 466 (l)âAssess and collect fees. 467 (m)âAccept any and all appropriate gifts, donations, grants 468 of money, other sources of revenue, equipment, supplies, 469 materials, and services, and receive, use, and dispose of the 470 same, provided that the commission avoids any appearance of 471 impropriety or conflict of interest. 472 (n)âLease, purchase, retain, own, hold, improve, or use any 473 property, real, personal, or mixed, or any undivided interest 474 therein. 475 (o)âSell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, 476 abandon, or otherwise dispose of any property, real, personal, 477 or mixed. 478 (p)âEstablish a budget and make expenditures. 479 (q)âBorrow money in a fiscally responsible manner. 480 (r)âAppoint committees, including standing committees, 481 composed of commissioners, state regulators, state legislators 482 or their representatives, and consumer representatives, and such 483 other interested persons as may be designated in this compact 484 and the bylaws. 485 (s)âProvide and receive information from, and cooperate 486 with, law enforcement agencies. 487 (t)âEstablish and elect an executive committee, including a 488 chair, vice-chair, secretary, treasurer, and such other offices 489 as the commission shall establish by rule or bylaw. 490 (u)âEnter into contracts or arrangements for the management 491 of the affairs of the commission. 492 (v)âDetermine whether a stateâs adopted language is 493 materially different from the model compact language such that 494 the state does not qualify for participation in the compact. 495 (w)âPerform such other functions as may be necessary or 496 appropriate to achieve the purposes of this compact. 497 (4)âTHE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE.â 498 (a)âThe executive committee shall have the power to act on 499 behalf of the commission according to the terms of this compact. 500 The powers, duties, and responsibilities of the executive 501 committee include: 502 1.âOverseeing the day-to-day activities of the 503 administration of the compact, including enforcement of and 504 compliance with the compact, commission rules and bylaws, and 505 other such duties as deemed necessary. 506 2.âRecommending to the commission changes to the rules or 507 bylaws, changes to the compact legislation, fees charged to 508 compact member states, fees charged to licensees, and other 509 fees. 510 3.âEnsuring compact administration services are 511 appropriately provided, including by contract. 512 4.âPreparing and recommending the budget. 513 5.âMaintaining financial records on behalf of the 514 commission. 515 6.âMonitoring compact compliance of member states and 516 providing compliance reports to the commission. 517 7.âEstablishing additional committees as necessary. 518 8.âExercising the powers and duties of the commission 519 during the interim between commission meetings, except for 520 adopting or amending rules, adopting or amending bylaws, and 521 exercising any other powers and duties expressly reserved to the 522 commission by rule or bylaw. 523 9.âPerforming other duties as provided in the rules or 524 bylaws of the commission. 525 (b)âThe executive committee shall be composed of up to nine 526 members, as further provided in the bylaws of the commission: 527 1.âSeven voting members who are elected by the commission 528 from the current membership of the commission. 529 2.âTwo ex-officio, nonvoting members. 530 (c)âThe commission may remove any member of the executive 531 committee as provided in the commissionâs bylaws. 532 (d)âThe executive committee shall meet at least annually. 533 1.âExecutive committee meetings shall be open to the 534 public, except that the executive committee may meet in a 535 closed, nonpublic meeting as provided in paragraph (6)(d). 536 2.âThe executive committee shall give advance notice of its 537 meetings, posted on its website and as determined to provide 538 notice to persons with an interest in the business of the 539 commission. 540 3.âThe executive committee may hold a special meeting in 541 accordance with paragraph (6)(b). 542 (5)âREPORT.âThe commission shall adopt and provide to the 543 member states an annual report. 544 (6)âMEETINGS OF THE COMMISSION.â 545 (a)âAll meetings of the commission which are not closed 546 pursuant to paragraph (d) shall be open to the public. Notice of 547 public meetings shall be posted on the commissionâs website at 548 least 30 days before the public meeting. 549 (b)âNotwithstanding paragraph (a), the commission may 550 convene an emergency public meeting by providing at least 24 551 hoursâ notice on the commissionâs website, and by any other 552 means as provided in the commissionâs rules, for any of the 553 reasons it may dispense with notice of proposed rulemaking under 554 subsection (7) of Article IX. The commissionâs legal counsel 555 shall certify that one of the reasons justifying an emergency 556 public meeting has been met. 557 (c)âNotice of all commission meetings must provide the 558 time, date, and location of the meeting, and if the meeting is 559 to be held or accessible via telecommunication, video 560 conference, or other electronic means, the notice shall include 561 the mechanism for access to the meeting. 562 (d)âThe commission or the executive committee may convene 563 in a closed, nonpublic meeting for the commission or executive 564 committee to receive or solicit legal advice or to discuss any 565 of the following: 566 1.âNoncompliance of a member state with its obligations 567 under the compact; 568 2.âThe employment, compensation, discipline, or other 569 matters, practices, or procedures related to specific employees; 570 3.âCurrent or threatened discipline of a licensee or 571 compact privilege holder by the commission or by a member 572 stateâs respiratory therapy licensing authority; 573 4.âCurrent, threatened, or reasonably anticipated 574 litigation; 575 5.âNegotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or 576 sale of goods, services, or real estate; 577 6.âAccusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any 578 person; 579 7.âTrade secrets or commercial or financial information 580 that is privileged or confidential; 581 8.âInformation of a personal nature where disclosure would 582 constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy; 583 9.âInvestigative records compiled for law enforcement 584 purposes; 585 10.âInformation related to any investigative reports 586 prepared by, on behalf of, or for use by the commission or other 587 committee charged with responsibility of investigation or 588 determination of compliance issues pursuant to the compact; 589 11.âLegal advice; 590 12.âMatters specifically exempted from disclosure by 591 federal or member state law; or 592 13.âOther matters as adopted by the commission by rule. 593 (e)âIf a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed, the 594 presiding officer shall state that the meeting will be closed 595 and reference each relevant exempting provision, and such 596 reference shall be recorded in the minutes. 597 (f)âThe commission shall keep minutes in accordance with 598 commission rules and bylaws. All documents considered in 599 connection with an action shall be identified in such minutes. 600 All minutes and documents of a closed meeting shall remain under 601 seal, subject to release only by a majority vote of the 602 commission or order of a court of competent jurisdiction. 603 (7)âFINANCING OF THE COMMISSION.â 604 (a)âThe commission shall pay, or provide for the payment 605 of, the reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization, 606 and ongoing activities. 607 (b)âThe commission may accept any and all appropriate 608 revenue sources as provided herein. 609 (c)âThe commission may levy on and collect an annual 610 assessment from each member state and impose fees on licensees 611 of member states that are granted compact privilege to cover the 612 cost of the operations and activities of the commission and its 613 staff. The aggregate annual assessment amount for member states, 614 if any, shall be allocated based upon a formula that the 615 commission shall adopt by rule. 616 (d)âThe commission may not incur obligations of any kind 617 before securing the funds or a loan adequate to meet the same, 618 nor pledge the credit of any of the member states, except by and 619 with the authority of the member state. 620 (e)âThe commission shall keep accurate accounts of all 621 receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of 622 the commission are subject to the financial review and 623 accounting procedures established under its bylaws. However, all 624 receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the commission 625 are subject to an annual financial review by a certified or 626 licensed public accountant, and the report of the financial 627 review shall be included in and become part of the annual report 628 of the commission. 629 (8)âQUALIFIED IMMUNITY, DEFENSE, AND INDEMNIFICATION.â 630 (a)âThis compact does not limit the liability of any 631 licensee for professional malpractice or misconduct, which shall 632 be governed solely by any other applicable state laws. 633 (b)âThe member states, commissioners, officers, executive 634 directors, employees, and agents of the commission are immune 635 from suit and liability, both personally and in their official 636 capacity, for any claim for damage to or loss of property, 637 personal injury, or other civil liability caused by or arising 638 out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that 639 occurred, or that the person against whom the claim is made had 640 a reasonable basis for believing occurred, within the scope of 641 commission employment, duties, or responsibilities. This 642 paragraph does not protect any such person from suit or 643 liability for any damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by 644 the intentional, willful, or wanton misconduct of that person. 645 The procurement of insurance of any type by the commission does 646 not in any way compromise or limit the immunity granted 647 hereunder. 648 (c)âThe commission shall defend any commissioner, officer, 649 executive director, employee, and agent of the commission in any 650 civil action seeking to impose liability arising out of any 651 actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within 652 the scope of commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, 653 or as determined by the commission that the person against whom 654 the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred 655 within the scope of commission employment, duties, or 656 responsibilities. This paragraph does not prohibit that person 657 from retaining counsel at his or her own expense; and provided 658 further, that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did 659 not result from that personâs intentional, willful, or wanton 660 misconduct. 661 (d)âThe commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any 662 commissioner, member, officer, executive director, employee, and 663 agent of the commission for the amount of any settlement or 664 judgment obtained against that person arising out of any actual 665 or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the 666 scope of commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or 667 that such person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred 668 within the scope of commission employment, duties, or 669 responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, 670 error, or omission did not result from the intentional, willful, 671 or wanton misconduct of that person. 672 (e)âThis compact does not waive or otherwise abrogate a 673 member stateâs state action immunity or state action affirmative 674 defense with respect to antitrust claims under the Sherman Act, 675 the Clayton Act, or any other state or federal antitrust or 676 anticompetitive law or regulation. 677 (f)âThis compact does not waive sovereign immunity by the 678 member states or by the commission. 679 680 ARTICLE VIII 681 DATA SYSTEM 682 683 (1)âThe commission shall provide for the development, 684 maintenance, operation, and utilization of a coordinated 685 database and reporting system containing licensure, adverse 686 action, and the presence of significant investigative 687 information. 688 (2)âNotwithstanding any other provision of state law to the 689 contrary, a member state shall submit a uniform data set to the 690 data system as required by the rules of the commission, 691 including, but not limited to, all of the following: 692 (a)âIdentifying information. 693 (b)âLicensure data. 694 (c)âAdverse actions against a licensee, license applicant, 695 or compact privilege holder and information related thereto. 696 (d)âNonconfidential information related to alternative 697 program participation, the beginning and ending dates of such 698 participation, and other information related to such 699 participation not made confidential under member state law. 700 (e)âAny denial of application for licensure and the reasons 701 for such denial. 702 (f)âThe presence of current significant investigative 703 information. 704 (g)âOther information that may facilitate the 705 administration of this compact or the protection of the public, 706 as determined by commission rules. 707 (3)âA member state may not submit any information that 708 constitutes criminal history record information, as defined by 709 applicable federal law, to the data system. 710 (4)âThe records and information provided to a member state 711 pursuant to this compact or through the data system, when 712 certified by the commission or an agent thereof, constitutes the 713 authenticated business records of the commission and are 714 entitled to any associated hearsay exception in any relevant 715 judicial, quasi-judicial, or administrative proceedings in a 716 member state. 717 (5)âSignificant investigative information pertaining to a 718 licensee in any member state will only be available to other 719 member states. 720 (6)âIt is the responsibility of the member states to report 721 any adverse action against a licensee and to monitor the 722 database to determine whether adverse action has been taken 723 against a licensee. Adverse action information pertaining to a 724 licensee in any member state will be available to any other 725 member state. 726 (7)âMember states contributing information to the data 727 system may designate information that may not be shared with the 728 public without the express permission of the contributing state. 729 (8)âAny information submitted to the data system which is 730 subsequently expunged pursuant to federal law or the laws of the 731 member state contributing the information shall be removed from 732 the data system. 733 734 ARTICLE IX 735 RULEMAKING 736 737 (1)âThe commission shall adopt reasonable rules in order to 738 effectively and efficiently implement and administer the 739 purposes and provisions of this compact. A rule shall be invalid 740 and have no force or effect only if a court of competent 741 jurisdiction holds that the rule is invalid because the 742 commission exercised its rulemaking authority in a manner that 743 is beyond the scope and purposes of this compact, or the powers 744 granted hereunder, or based upon another applicable standard of 745 review. 746 (2)âFor purposes of this compact, the rules of the 747 commission shall have the force of law in each member state. 748 (3)âThe commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers 749 pursuant to the criteria provided in this article and the rules 750 adopted hereunder. Rules become binding as of the date specified 751 in each rule. 752 (4)âIf a majority of the legislatures of the member states 753 rejects a rule or portion of a rule, by enactment of a statute 754 or resolution in the same manner used to adopt the compact 755 within 4 years after the date of adoption of the rule, then such 756 rule shall have no further force and effect in any member state. 757 (5)âRules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting 758 of the commission. 759 (6)âBefore adoption of a proposed rule, the commission 760 shall hold a public hearing and allow persons to provide oral 761 and written comments, data, facts, opinions, and arguments. 762 (7)âBefore adoption of a proposed rule by the commission, 763 and at least 30 days before the meeting at which the commission 764 will hold a public hearing on the proposed rule, the commission 765 shall provide a notice of proposed rulemaking in all of the 766 following manners: 767 (a)âOn the website of the commission or other publicly 768 accessible platform. 769 (b)âTo persons who have requested notice of the 770 commissionâs notices of proposed rulemaking. 771 (c)âIn such other ways as the commission may by rule 772 specify. 773 (8)âThe notice of proposed rulemaking shall include all of 774 the following information: 775 (a)âThe time, date, and location of the public hearing at 776 which the commission will hear public comments on the proposed 777 rule and, if different, the time, date, and location of the 778 meeting where the commission will consider and vote on the 779 proposed rule. 780 (b)âIf the hearing is held via telecommunication, video 781 conference, or other electronic means, the commission shall 782 include the mechanism for access to the hearing in the notice of 783 proposed rulemaking. 784 (c)âThe text of and reason for the proposed rule. 785 (d)âA request for comments on the proposed rule from any 786 interested person. 787 (e)âThe manner in which interested persons may submit 788 written comments. 789 (9)âAll hearings will be recorded. A copy of the recording 790 and all written comments and documents received by the 791 commission in response to the proposed rule shall be available 792 to the public. 793 (10)âThis article does not require a separate hearing on 794 each rule. Rules may be grouped for the convenience of the 795 commission at hearings required by this article. 796 (11)âThe commission shall, by majority vote of all 797 commissioners, take final action on the proposed rule based on 798 the rulemaking record and the full text of the rule. 799 (a)âThe commission may adopt changes to the proposed rule, 800 provided the changes are consistent with the original purpose of 801 the proposed rule. 802 (b)âThe commission shall provide an explanation of the 803 reasons for substantive changes made to the proposed rule as 804 well as reasons for substantive changes not made which were 805 recommended by commenters. 806 (c)âThe commission shall determine a reasonable effective 807 date for the rule. Except for an emergency as provided in 808 subsection (12), the effective date of the rule shall be no 809 sooner than 30 days after issuing the notice that it adopted or 810 amended the rule. 811 (12)âUpon determination that an emergency exists, the 812 commission may consider and adopt an emergency rule with 24 813 hoursâ notice, and with opportunity to comment, provided that 814 the usual rulemaking procedures provided in the compact and in 815 this article shall be retroactively applied to the rule as soon 816 as reasonably possible, in no event later than 90 days after the 817 effective date of the rule. For the purposes of this subsection, 818 an emergency rule is one that must be adopted immediately in 819 order to: 820 (a)âMeet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or 821 welfare; 822 (b)âPrevent a loss of commission or member state funds; 823 (c)âMeet a deadline for the adoption of a rule that is 824 established by federal law or rule; or 825 (d)âProtect public health and safety. 826 (13)âThe commission or an authorized committee of the 827 commission may direct revisions to a previously adopted rule for 828 purposes of correcting typographical errors, errors in format, 829 errors in consistency, or grammatical errors. Public notice of 830 any revisions shall be posted on the website of the commission. 831 The revision shall be subject to challenge by any person for a 832 period of 30 days after posting. The revision may be challenged 833 only on grounds that the revision results in a material change 834 to a rule. A challenge shall be made in writing and delivered to 835 the commission before the end of the notice period. If no 836 challenge is made, the revision will take effect without further 837 action. If the revision is challenged, the revision may not take 838 effect without the approval of the commission. 839 (14)âA member stateâs rulemaking process or procedural 840 requirements do not apply to the commission. The commission does 841 not have authority over any member stateâs rulemaking process or 842 procedural requirements that do not pertain to the compact. 843 (15)âThis compact, or any rule or regulation of the 844 commission, does not limit, restrict, or in any way reduce the 845 ability of a member state to enact and enforce laws, 846 regulations, or other rules related to the practice of 847 respiratory therapy in that state, where those laws, 848 regulations, or other rules are not inconsistent with the 849 provisions of this compact. 850 851 ARTICLE X 852 OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, AND ENFORCEMENT 853 854 (1)(a)âThe executive and judicial branches of state 855 government in each member state shall enforce this compact and 856 take all actions necessary and appropriate to implement this 857 compact. 858 (b)âVenue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against 859 the commission shall be brought solely and exclusively in a 860 court of competent jurisdiction where the principal office of 861 the commission is located. The commission may waive venue and 862 jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or consents to 863 participate in alternative dispute resolution proceedings. 864 Nothing herein affects or limits the selection or propriety of 865 venue in any action against a licensee for professional 866 malpractice, misconduct, or any such similar matter. 867 (c)âThe commission is entitled to receive service of 868 process in any proceeding regarding the enforcement or 869 interpretation of this compact and has standing to intervene in 870 such a proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide the 871 commission service of process shall render a judgment or order 872 void as to the commission, this compact, or adopted rules. 873 (2)(a)âIf the commission determines that a member state has 874 defaulted in the performance of its obligations or 875 responsibilities under this compact or the adopted rules, the 876 commission shall provide written notice to the defaulting state. 877 The notice of default shall describe the default, the proposed 878 means of curing the default, and any other action that the 879 commission may take and shall offer training and specific 880 technical assistance regarding the default. 881 (b)âThe commission shall provide a copy of the notice of 882 default to the other member states. 883 (3)âIf a state in default fails to cure the default, the 884 defaulting state may be terminated from the compact upon an 885 affirmative vote of a majority of the commissioners of the 886 member states, and all rights, privileges, and benefits 887 conferred on that state by this compact may be terminated on the 888 effective date of termination. A cure of the default does not 889 relieve the offending state of obligations or liabilities 890 incurred during the period of default. 891 (4)âTermination of membership in this compact shall be 892 imposed only after all other means of securing compliance have 893 been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or terminate shall 894 be given by the commission to the Governor, the Majority Leaders 895 and Minority Leaders of the defaulting stateâs Legislature, the 896 defaulting stateâs respiratory therapy licensing authority, and 897 each of the member statesâ respiratory therapy licensing 898 authorities. 899 (5)âA state that has been terminated is responsible for all 900 assessments, obligations, and liabilities incurred through the 901 effective date of termination, including obligations that extend 902 beyond the effective date of termination, if necessary. 903 (6)âUpon the termination of a stateâs membership from this 904 compact, that state shall immediately provide notice to all 905 licensees and compact privilege holders of which the commission 906 has a record within that state of the termination. The 907 terminated state shall continue to recognize all licenses 908 granted pursuant to the compact for a minimum of 180 days after 909 the date of the notice of termination. 910 (7)âThe commission may not bear any costs related to a 911 state that is found to be in default or that has been terminated 912 from the compact, unless agreed upon in writing between the 913 commission and the defaulting state. 914 (8)âThe defaulting state may appeal the action of the 915 commission by petitioning the United States District Court for 916 the District of Columbia or the federal district where the 917 commission has its principal offices. The prevailing party shall 918 be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable 919 attorney fees. 920 (9)(a)âUpon request by a member state, the commission shall 921 attempt to resolve disputes related to the compact which arise 922 among member states and between member and nonmember states. 923 (b)âThe commission shall adopt a rule providing for both 924 mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes, as 925 appropriate. 926 (10)(a)âBy majority vote, as may be further provided by 927 rule, the commission may initiate legal action against a member 928 state in default in the United States District Court for the 929 District of Columbia or the federal district where the 930 commission has its principal offices to enforce compliance with 931 this compact and its adopted rules. A member state, by enactment 932 of this compact, consents to venue and jurisdiction in such 933 court for the purposes provided herein. The relief sought may 934 include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event 935 judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be 936 awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable 937 attorney fees. The remedies herein are not the exclusive 938 remedies of the commission. The commission may pursue any other 939 remedies available under federal law or the defaulting member 940 stateâs law. 941 (b)âA member state may initiate legal action against the 942 commission in the United States District Court for the District 943 of Columbia or the federal district where the commission has its 944 principal offices to enforce compliance with this compact and 945 its adopted rules. The relief sought may include both injunctive 946 relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is 947 necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of 948 such litigation, including reasonable attorney fees. 949 (c)âOnly a member state may enforce this compact against 950 the commission. 951 952 ARTICLE XI 953 EFFECTIVE DATE, WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENT 954 955 (1)âThis compact shall come into effect on the date on 956 which the compact statute is enacted into law in the seventh 957 member state. 958 (a)âOn or after the effective date of the compact, the 959 commission shall convene and review the enactment of each of the 960 first seven member states to determine if the statute enacted by 961 each such charter member state is materially different from the 962 model compact. 963 1.âA charter member state whose enactment is found to be 964 materially different from the model compact is entitled to the 965 default process provided in Article X. 966 2.âIf any member state is later found to be in default, or 967 is terminated or withdraws from the compact, the commission 968 shall remain in existence and the compact shall remain in effect 969 even if the number of member states is fewer than seven. 970 (b)âMember states enacting the compact subsequent to the 971 seven initial charter member states shall be subject to the 972 process provided herein and commission rule to determine if such 973 stateâs enactments are materially different from the model 974 compact and whether the state qualifies for participation in the 975 compact. 976 (c)âAll actions taken for the benefit of the commission or 977 in furtherance of the purposes of the administration of the 978 compact before the effective date of the compact or the 979 commission coming into existence are considered to be actions of 980 the commission unless specifically repudiated by the commission. 981 The commission owns and has all rights to any intellectual 982 property developed on behalf or in furtherance of the commission 983 by individuals or entities involved in organizing or 984 establishing the commission, as may be further provided in 985 commission rules. 986 (d)âAny state that joins the compact subsequent to the 987 commissionâs initial adoption of the rules and bylaws is subject 988 to the rules and bylaws as they exist on the date on which the 989 compact becomes law in that state. Any rule or bylaw that has 990 been previously adopted by the commission has the full force and 991 effect of law on the date the compact becomes law in that state. 992 (2)âAny member state may withdraw from this compact by 993 enacting a statute repealing the same. 994 (a)âA member stateâs withdrawal does not take effect until 995 180 days after enactment of the repealing statute. 996 (b)âWithdrawal does not affect the continuing requirement 997 of the withdrawing stateâs respiratory therapy licensing 998 authority to comply with the investigative and adverse action 999 reporting requirements of this compact before the effective date 1000 of withdrawal. 1001 (c)âUpon the enactment of a statute withdrawing from this 1002 compact, a state shall immediately provide notice of such 1003 withdrawal to all licensees and compact privilege holders of 1004 which the commission has a record within that state. 1005 Notwithstanding any subsequent statutory enactment to the 1006 contrary, such withdrawing state shall continue to recognize all 1007 licenses granted pursuant to this compact for a minimum of 180 1008 days after the date of such notice of withdrawal. 1009 (3)âThis compact does not invalidate or prevent any 1010 licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a 1011 member state and a nonmember state that does not conflict with 1012 the provisions of this compact. 1013 (4)âThis compact may be amended by the member states. An 1014 amendment to this compact does not become effective and binding 1015 upon any member state until it is enacted into the laws of all 1016 member states. 1017 1018 ARTICLE XII 1019 CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY 1020 1021 (1)âThis compact and the commissionâs rulemaking authority 1022 shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes 1023 and the implementation and administration of the compact. 1024 Provisions of the compact expressly authorizing or requiring the 1025 adoption of rules does not limit the commissionâs rulemaking 1026 authority solely for those purposes. 1027 (2)âThe provisions of this compact are severable, and if 1028 any phrase, clause, sentence, or provision of this compact is 1029 held by a court of competent jurisdiction to be contrary to the 1030 constitution of any member state, a state seeking participation 1031 in the compact, or the United States, or the applicability 1032 thereof to any government, agency, person, or circumstance is 1033 held to be unconstitutional by a court of competent 1034 jurisdiction, the validity of the remainder of this compact and 1035 the applicability thereof to any other government, agency, 1036 person, or circumstance is not affected. 1037 (3)âNotwithstanding subsection (2), the commission may deny 1038 a stateâs participation in the compact or, in accordance with 1039 the requirements of Article X, terminate a member stateâs 1040 participation in the compact, if it determines that a 1041 constitutional requirement of a member state is a material 1042 departure from the compact. Otherwise, if the compact is held to 1043 be contrary to the constitution of any member state, the compact 1044 shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining member 1045 states and in full force and effect as to the member state 1046 affected as to all severable matters. 1047 1048 ARTICLE XIII 1049 CONSISTENT EFFECT AND CONFLICT WITH OTHER STATE LAWS 1050 1051 (1)âThis compact does not prevent or inhibit the 1052 enforcement of any other law of a member state that is not 1053 inconsistent with the compact. 1054 (2)âAny laws, statutes, regulations, or other legal 1055 requirements in a member state in conflict with this compact are 1056 superseded to the extent of the conflict, including any 1057 subsequently enacted state laws. 1058 (3)âAll permissible agreements between the commission and 1059 the member states are binding in accordance with their terms. 1060 (4)âOther than as expressly provided herein, this compact 1061 does not impact initial licensure. 1062 Section 2.âSubsection (5) of section 456.076, Florida 1063 Statutes, is amended to read: 1064 456.076âImpaired practitioner programs.â 1065 (5)âA consultant shall enter into a participant contract 1066 with an impaired practitioner and shall establish the terms of 1067 monitoring and shall include the terms in a participant 1068 contract. In establishing the terms of monitoring, the 1069 consultant may consider the recommendations of one or more 1070 approved evaluators, treatment programs, or treatment providers. 1071 A consultant may modify the terms of monitoring if the 1072 consultant concludes, through the course of monitoring, that 1073 extended, additional, or amended terms of monitoring are 1074 required for the protection of the health, safety, and welfare 1075 of the public. If the impaired practitioner is an audiologist or 1076 a speech-language pathologist practicing under the Audiology and 1077 Speech-Language Pathology Interstate Compact pursuant to s. 1078 468.1335, a respiratory therapist holding compact privilege 1079 under the Respiratory Care Interstate Compact pursuant to s. 1080 468.371, a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant 1081 practicing under the Physical Therapy Licensure Compact pursuant 1082 to s. 486.112, a psychologist practicing under the Psychology 1083 Interjurisdictional Compact pursuant to s. 490.0075, or a health 1084 care practitioner practicing under the Professional Counselors 1085 Licensure Compact pursuant to s. 491.017, the terms of the 1086 monitoring contract must include the impaired practitionerâs 1087 withdrawal from all practice under the compact unless authorized 1088 by a member state. 1089 Section 3.âPresent subsection (3) of section 468.353, 1090 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (4), and a new 1091 subsection (3) is added to that section to read: 1092 468.353âBoard of Respiratory Care; powers and duties.â 1093 (3)âThe board shall appoint an individual to serve as the 1094 stateâs commissioner on the Respiratory Care Interstate Compact 1095 Commission pursuant to s. 468.371. 1096 Section 4.âSection 468.355, Florida Statutes, is amended to 1097 read: 1098 468.355âLicensure requirements.âTo be eligible for 1099 licensure by the board, an applicant must be an active 1100 âcertified respiratory therapistâ or an active âregistered 1101 respiratory therapistâ as designated by the National Board for 1102 Respiratory Care, or its successor, and submit to background 1103 screening in accordance with s. 456.0135. A person licensed as a 1104 respiratory therapist in another state who is practicing under 1105 the Respiratory Care Interstate Compact under s. 468.371, and 1106 only within the scope provided therein, is exempt from the 1107 licensure requirements of this section. 1108 Section 5.âSubsection (5) is added to section 468.361, 1109 Florida Statutes, to read: 1110 468.361âRenewal of licensure; continuing education.â 1111 (5)âThe board may take adverse action against the compact 1112 privilege of a respiratory therapist under s. 468.371 and may 1113 impose any of the penalties in s. 456.072(2) if a respiratory 1114 therapist commits an act specified in s. 468.365(1) or s. 1115 456.072(1). 1116 Section 6.âParagraph (m) is added to subsection (10) of 1117 section 768.28, Florida Statutes, to read: 1118 768.28âWaiver of sovereign immunity in tort actions; 1119 recovery limits; civil liability for damages caused during a 1120 riot; limitation on attorney fees; statute of limitations; 1121 exclusions; indemnification; risk management programs.â 1122 (10) 1123 (m)âFor purposes of this section, the individual appointed 1124 under s. 468.371 as the stateâs commissioner on the Respiratory 1125 Care Interstate Compact Commission, when serving in that 1126 capacity pursuant to s. 468.371, and any administrator, officer, 1127 executive director, employee, or representative of the 1128 Respiratory Care Interstate Compact Commission, when acting 1129 within the scope of his or her employment, duties, or 1130 responsibilities in this state, is considered an agent of the 1131 state. The commission shall pay any claims or judgments pursuant 1132 to this section and may maintain insurance coverage to pay any 1133 such claims or judgments. 1134 Section 7.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.